New Jersey, session 222, A1319.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A public institution of higher education shall adopt a policy to permit a student to withdraw for an extenuating circumstance and receive a refund. b.    The policy shall: (1)   define extenuating circumstance, which shall include, but is not limited to: illness; injury; hospitalization; and mental health and wellness; (2)   include a provision to refund tuition and fees paid by the student for the semester in which the student withdraws if the extenuating circumstances inhibit the students ability to acquire an education at the institution; (3)   establish criteria to determine whether a students ability to acquire an education has been inhibited by an extenuating circumstance; (4)   include a provision that any student who withdraws in compliance with the policy and who has paid amounts for room, board, or fees is entitled to a refund of the portion of those charges attributable to the time period during which the facilities or services were not used by the student; and (5)   explain that any refund payable to a student who is a financial aid recipient or State aid recipient is subject to the applicable State and federal laws and regulations regarding refunds. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment.